Vermont, session 2025-2026, H824.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2466e is added to read:
§ 2466e. VEHICLE PHONE DISCONNECTION
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “App publisher” means a publisher of a mobile phone application
that provides the ability for a user of the application to connect to a vehicle
through the application and gain information about the vehicle or to control
certain aspects of the vehicle, including the ability to:
VT LEG #386310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.824
2026 Page 2 of 3
(A) track the location of the vehicle;
(B) start or turn off the vehicle; or
(C) do any other thing that, without the application, would require the
user to be an occupant of the vehicle.
(2) “Motor vehicle” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A. § 4(21).
(3) “Vehicle” includes all motor vehicles that have a telematic control
unit, or similar technology, that is compatible with the U.S. cellular network
and allows for a user to connect to the vehicle with a mobile phone application.
(4) “Vehicle manufacturer” means the original manufacturer or
assembler of a vehicle.
(b) Requirements.
(1) An app publisher shall provide in the mobile phone application a
process where an occupant of the vehicle can:
(A) determine whether there is one or more users connected to the
vehicle through the mobile phone application; and
(B) disconnect any user that, through the mobile phone application, is
connected to the vehicle.
(2) The process provided pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection
shall:
(A) be no more difficult or burdensome than the process to connect to
the vehicle through the mobile phone application;
VT LEG #386310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.824
2026 Page 3 of 3
(B) require the occupant to be inside the vehicle;
(C) not require:
(i) any special tools or skills;
(ii) separate consent from the vehicle manufacturer or app
publisher; or
(iii) permission or consent from the user that is being
disconnected; and
(D) disconnect any users so chosen by the occupant in a reasonable
amount of time, but not later than 30 minutes after the occupant has completed
the in-vehicle process.
(c) Enforcement. A violation of this section constitutes a violation of
section 2453 of this title.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386310 v.1